Mississippi, session 2026, HB1640.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following shall be codified as Section 43-12-18, Mississippi Code of 1972: 43-12-18.  The Department of Human Services shall employ automated commercial wage verification services regulated under the Fair Credit Reporting Act for the purpose of acquiring current employment and income information for eligibility determination and ongoing monitoring for continued eligibility for public benefit programs, including SNAP and TANF benefits. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.